Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB25.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 512 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Atmospheric contaminant":
1. Means any type of aerosol, biological, nonbiological, or hazardous
agent, chaff, chemical, chemical compound, genetically modified
agent, metal, radioactive material, substance, vapor, electromagnetic
radiation or field, mechanical vibration, particulate of any size, or any
air pollutant regulated by the Commonwealth, and any combination
thereof; and
2. Does not include engine exhaust from an aircraft using unadulterated
certified aviation fuel;
(b) "Atmospheric polluting intervention" means any manipulation or
interference with earth's natural systems or processes by altering
atmospheric or environmental conditions by:
1. Stratospheric aerosol injection;
2. Cloud seeding;
3. Solar radiation modification; or
4. The intentional release of an atmospheric contaminant from an
airborne source that may have harmful consequences on human
health, the environment, or agriculture, excluding any release or
emission from a ground-level source including but not limited to an
industrial or commercial activity or facility, residence, vehicle, or
agricultural operation;
(c) "Chaff" means aluminum-coated silica glass fibers, typically dispersed in
bundles containing millions of inhalable fibers, which break apart and fall
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 12/15/2025 10:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 18
to the ground;
(d) "Cloud seeding" means a type of weather modification that attempts to
change the amount or type of precipitation from a cloud by dispersing any
one (1) or more atmospheric contaminants into the air;
(e) "Hazardous" means a substance, apparatus, activity, or physical agent that
by its nature is harmful to living organisms, property, or any other valuable
interest;
(f) "Person" means:
1. Any natural person, trust, firm, joint stock company, corporation,
quasi-governmental corporation, nongovernmental organization,
public or private partnership, association, syndicate, club, college, or
university;
2. Any agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of federal, state, or local
government; or
3. Any interstate or international governance body;
(g) "Physical agent" means a source of energy that may cause injury through
excessive exposure, including but not limited to radiofrequency, microwave,
and other electromagnetic radiation and fields, barometric pressure,
temperature, gravity, mechanical vibration, and sound;
(h) "Release" means any activity that results in the issuance of atmospheric
contaminants such as the emitting, transmitting, discharging, or injecting of
one (1) or more nuclear, biological, chemical, or physical agents into the
ambient atmosphere, whether once, intermittently, or continuously;
(i) "Solar radiation modification" means an experiment in the earth's climatic
system involving the release of atmospheric contaminants that reduce the
amount of sunlight reaching the earth's surface through the use of
interoperable ground-based, airborne, space-based, or other facilities;
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 12/15/2025 10:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 18
(j) "Stratospheric aerosol injection" means the release of reflective sulfate or
other aerosol substances in the stratosphere by high-altitude planes,
balloons, high-altitude blimps, artillery, or any other means; and
(k) "Weather modification" means the changing, controlling, or interfering
with or attempting to change, control, or interfere with the natural
development of cloud forms, precipitation, barometric pressure,
temperature, conductivity or other electromagnetic or sonic characteristics
of the atmosphere.
(2) A person is guilty of criminal atmospheric pollution when he or she intentionally
or wantonly engages in any atmospheric polluting intervention.
(3) Criminal atmospheric pollution shall be a Class D felony. Notwithstanding KRS
534.030 and 534.050, and in addition to any other penalties that may apply, a
person guilty of criminal atmospheric pollution shall pay a civil penalty of not
less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000). Each day that a person
engages in criminal atmospheric pollution shall be considered a separate offense.
(4) All peace officers of the Commonwealth shall enforce the requirements of this
section, and any person may make a complaint to any peace officer or local law
enforcement official relating to any suspected violation of this section.
(5) If any criminal atmospheric pollution has been approved, explicitly or implicitly,
by a federal government agency or official, the arresting officer shall issue a
notice to the appropriate federal agency or official that the criminal atmospheric
pollution intervention cannot lawfully be carried out within or over the
Commonwealth.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 12/15/2025 10:01 AM Jacketed